Hawaii statutes.
[§196-5] Gas appliances with pilot light
prohibited; exemptions. (a) No new residential type gas appliance that is
equipped with a pilot light shall be sold or installed in the State after
June 30, 1980. Gas appliances sold after June 30, 1980, shall be
equipped with an intermittent ignition system or other ignition devices in lieu
of gas pilot lights.

(b) Beginning ninety days after May 30,
1978, the energy resources coordinator or its successor entity shall notify, in
writing, all retail sellers of gas appliances doing business in the State of
the provisions of this section.

(c) The provisions of this section shall not
apply to any hot water heaters with pilot lights or to any gas appliance which
can be conclusively demonstrated by the equipment manufacturer, to the
satisfaction of the energy resources coordinator or its successor entity, that
the gas pilot device in the appliance:

(1) Has a substantial lower life cycle cost than an
electric ignition or other alternate ignition system;

(2) Is more energy efficient than available
alternatives; or

(3) Is necessary to safeguard public health and
safety.

(d) The provisions of this section shall not
apply to people living in areas that are served with unreliable electric
service or where it is not available.

(e) As used in this section:

(1) "Gas appliance" includes any new
residential type heater, refrigerator, stove, range, dishwasher, dryer, air
conditioner, decorative fireplace, or other similar devices;

(2) "Intermittent ignition device" means an
ignition device which is activated only when the gas appliance is in operation;
and

(3) "Pilot light" means any gas operated
device that remains continually operated or lighted in order to ignite a gas
appliance to normal operation. [L 1978, c 137, §2]

Revision Note

"May 30, 1978" substituted for "the
effective date of this Act".

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next